Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1414.08
Continuing education requirements;
certified reports; central registry.

Every law enforcement agency of
the state or any of its political subdivisions shall send the director certified
reports, on a form designed by the director, of the completion of the continuing
education requirements by its law enforcement officers at such time and in
such manner and detail as the director may prescribe. The director shall maintain
a record of the reports in a central registry.

Laws 2012, LB817, § 14.